Washington statutes.
RCW 11.32.060

To render account.

The special administrator shall also render an account, under oath, of his or her proceedings, in like manner as other administrators are required to do.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2029; 1965 c 145 s 11.32.060. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 86; RRS s 1456; prior: Code 1881 s 1424; 1863 p 223 s 142; 1860 p 185 s 109.]

NOTES:

Settlement of estates: Chapter 11.76 RCW.